New York, session 2025-2026, A8122.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 14.13 to read as follows: 3 § 14.13 New York state historic district telecommunications. 1. As 4 used in this section, "large urban telecommunication infrastructure" 5 means free-standing street or sidewalk public telecommunication infras- 6 tructure greater than eight feet in height. 7 2. The commissioner shall create a process to approve or deny any new 8 large urban telecommunication infrastructure that is proposed to be 9 located within two hundred feet of any site listed on the state register 10 or the national register or eligible to be listed on the national regis- 11 ter; provided, however, that such process shall not include any measures 12 preempted by section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act of 13 1966. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03118-03-5